California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) If assessment is needed, the assessment shall be performed within 120 days following initial intake. Assessment shall be performed as soon as possible and in no event more than 60 days following initial intake where any delay would expose the client to unnecessary risk to his or her health and safety or to significant further delay in mental or physical development, or the client would be at imminent risk of placement in a more restrictive environment. Assessment may include collection and review of available historical diagnostic data, provision or procurement of necessary tests and evaluations, and summarization of developmental levels and service needs and is conditional upon receipt of the release of information specified in subdivision (b).

(b) In determining if an individual meets the definition of developmental disability contained in subdivision (a) of Section 4512, the regional center may consider evaluations and tests, including, but not limited to, intelligence tests, adaptive functioning tests, neurological and neuropsychological tests, diagnostic tests performed by a physician, psychiatric tests, and other tests or evaluations that have been performed by, and are available from, other sources.

(c) At the time of assessment, the individual, or, where appropriate, the parents, legal guardian, or conservator, shall provide copies of any health benefit cards under which the consumer is eligible to receive health benefits, including, but not limited to, private health insurance, a health care service plan, Medi-Cal, Medicare, and TRICARE. If the individual, or where appropriate, the parents, legal guardians, or
 conservators, have no such benefits, the regional center shall not use that fact to negatively impact the services that the individual may or may not receive from the regional center.

(d) A regional center shall communicate with the consumer and his or her family pursuant to this section in their native language, including providing alternative communication services, as required by Sections 11135 to 11139.7, inclusive, of the Government Code and implementing regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 685, Sec. 5.   (SB 555)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4643.3.

(a) (1) On or before April 1, 2002, the department shall develop evaluation and diagnostic procedures for the diagnosis of autism disorder and other autistic spectrum disorders.

(2) The department shall publish or arrange for the publication of the evaluation and diagnostic procedures required by paragraph (1). The published evaluation and diagnostic procedures shall be available to the public.

(b) The department shall develop a training program for regional center clinical staff in the utilization of diagnostic procedures for the diagnosis of autism disorder. The training program shall be implemented on or before July 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 171, Sec. 26.   Effective August 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4643.5.

(a) If a consumer is, or has been determined to be, eligible or provisionally eligible for services by a regional center, the consumer shall also be considered eligible or provisionally eligible by any other regional center if the consumer has moved to another location within the state.

(b) An individual who is determined by any regional center to have a developmental disability or to be provisionally eligible shall remain eligible for services from regional centers unless a regional center, following a comprehensive reassessment, concludes that the original determination is clearly erroneous.

(c) Whenever a consumer transfers from one regional center catchment area to another, the level and
 types of services and supports specified in the consumer’s individual program plan (IPP) shall be authorized and secured, if available, pending the development of a new IPP for the consumer. If these services and supports do not exist, the regional center shall convene a meeting to develop a new IPP within 30 days. Prior to approval of the new IPP, the regional center shall provide alternative services and supports that best meet the IPP objectives in the least restrictive setting. The department shall develop guidelines that describe the responsibilities of regional centers in ensuring a smooth transition of services and supports from one regional center to another, including, but not limited to, pretransferring planning and a dispute resolution process to resolve disagreements between regional centers regarding their responsibilities related to the transfer of case management services.

(d) (1) The following procedures
 shall apply to a consumer who is transferred from one regional center’s catchment area to a different catchment area and meets any of the following conditions:

(A) The consumer has an order for foster care placement.

(B) The consumer is awaiting foster care placement.

(C) The consumer is placed in out-of-home care through voluntary placement as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 11400.

(2) (A) The county social worker or county probation officer shall immediately send a notice of relocation to the consumer’s regional center of origin, which is the sending regional center, regarding a consumer who meets the criteria set forth in paragraph (1). The consumer’s court-appointed attorney may also provide written notice of relocation.
 The notice of relocation shall be deemed received when the sending regional center receives written notice of relocation.

(B) Upon receiving the notice of relocation, the sending regional center shall immediately send a notice of transfer, and records needed for the planning process, including, but not limited to, the current IPP or individualized family services plan (IFSP), assessments, contact information for the consumer, the caregiver, the consumer's legal guardian, the current developmental services decisionmaker, and the current educational rights holder, by priority mail, facsimile, or email, to the receiving regional center, which is the regional center in the catchment area that the child will be transferred to.

(C) (i) The receiving regional center shall provide the sending regional center with contact information for a staff member who is
 available to confer with the planning team at the sending regional center regarding the types of services and providers available to address the service needs of the consumer in the consumer’s new residential location.

(ii) Within 14 days of the notice of transfer, the receiving regional center shall provide the sending regional center with information regarding appropriate vendors and services to meet the needs of the consumer.

(iii) The sending regional center shall confer with the planning team and, using information provided by the receiving regional center, determine whether changes to the current IPP or IFSP are needed to meet the service needs of the consumer in the new residential location.

(iv) Prior to transfer of case management, the sending regional center shall ensure that services needed to support the
 consumer in the new residential location are included in the IPP or IFSP and the consumer is receiving the services and supports listed in the new or revised IPP or IFSP.

(3) (A) In the case of a consumer receiving services under this division, notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 4646, the sending regional center shall make every reasonable effort to initiate services, as provided for in the consumer’s current IPP, as soon as possible following the notice of transfer to a new catchment area, but no later than 30 days from the date of notice of transfer. Efforts shall begin in advance of the IPP meeting. If all services identified in the consumer’s IPP have not been initiated within 30 calendar days of the notice of transfer, the regional center shall report to the court of jurisdiction as described in subparagraph (B).

(B) If all services identified in
 the consumer’s IPP have not been initiated within 30 calendar days after the notice of transfer, the sending regional center shall report in writing to the court, the county social worker or probation officer, as applicable, and the developmental services decisionmaker, all services that are being provided to the consumer, and the process to secure any additional services that have been identified in the consumer’s IPP but not yet initiated. If all services identified in the consumer’s IPP have not been initiated within 30 days, the regional center shall report in writing to the court, county social worker, probation officer, as applicable, and the developmental services decisionmaker at 30-day intervals until all services are initiated.

(C) (i) Services shall continue to be provided pursuant to subparagraph (A), pending the court’s appointment of a developmental services decisionmaker, pursuant to subdivision (g) of
 Section 319, subdivision (a) of Section 361, or subdivision (b) of Section 726.

(ii) If the regional center is unable to obtain confirmation of the parent’s, guardian’s, or current developmental services decisionmaker’s participation in the IPP meeting, the regional center shall notify the court having jurisdiction, the county placing agency, and the consumer’s attorney that the appointment of a new developmental services decisionmaker may be necessary.

(4) In the case of a consumer receiving services under the California Early Intervention Program pursuant to Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code, the following procedures shall apply:

(A) The sending regional center shall make every reasonable effort to initiate services, as provided for in the consumer’s current IFSP, as soon as possible
 following the notice of transfer but no later than 30 calendar days from the date of notice of transfer. Efforts shall begin in advance of the IFSP meeting. If all services identified in the consumer’s IFSP have not been initiated within 30 calendar days of the notice of transfer, the regional center shall report to the court of jurisdiction as described in subparagraph (B).

(B) If all services identified in the consumer’s IFSP have not been initiated within 30 calendar days of the notice of transfer, the sending regional center shall report in writing to the court, the county social worker or probation officer, as applicable, and the educational rights holder, all services that are being provided to the consumer, and the process to secure any additional services that have been identified in the consumer’s IFSP but not initiated. If all services identified in the consumer’s IFSP have not been initiated within 30 days, the regional center shall
 report in writing to the court, county social worker, probation officer, as applicable, and the educational rights holder at 30-day intervals until all services are initiated.

(C) (i) Services not requiring consent shall continue to be provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) pending the court’s appointment of an educational rights holder, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 319, subdivision (a) of Section 361, or subdivision (b) of Section 726.

(ii) If the regional center is unable to obtain confirmation of the parent’s, guardian’s, or current educational rights holder participation in the IFSP meeting, the regional center shall notify the court of jurisdiction, the county placing agency, and the consumer’s attorney that the appointment of a new educational rights holder may be necessary.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Consumer” refers to individuals as defined in Section 4512 and any eligible infant or toddler, as defined in Section 95014 of the Government Code.

(2) “Initiation of services” means the point at which the consumer begins to receive a particular service and may include assessment procedures for services, if necessary, if those services begin immediately following the completion of the assessment.

(3) “Notice of relocation” means a written notice informing a regional center that currently serves a consumer described in subdivision (d) that the consumer has been relocated to a foster home that is located in a catchment area that is not served by that regional center. “Notice of relocation” includes, at a minimum, the following
 information:

(A) The consumer’s name, date of birth, and current address.

(B) The name of the consumer’s caregiver.

(C) The court of jurisdiction.

(D) The name of, and contact information for, the consumer’s educational rights holder or developmental services decisionmaker, if applicable.

(E) The name of, and contact information for, any person who may provide authorization and consent for the release of the consumer’s regional center records or vendor assessment records, or both.

(4) “Notice of transfer” means a written notice that a consumer described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) is transferring from a regional
 center located in one catchment area to a regional center located in a different catchment area and includes, at a minimum, the following information:

(A) The consumer’s name and date of birth.

(B) The name of, and contact information for, the consumer’s parent, or the consumer’s educational rights holder or developmental services decisionmaker, if applicable.

(C) The name of, and contact information for, the consumer’s current caregiver.

(D) A copy of the consumer’s current IFSP or IPP.

(E) The name of, and contact information for, the child’s county social workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 30.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4644.

(a) In addition to any person eligible for initial intake or assessment services, regional centers may cause to be provided preventive services to any potential parent requesting these services and who is determined to be at high risk of parenting a developmentally disabled infant, or, at the request of the parent or guardian, to any infant at high risk of becoming developmentally disabled. It is the intent of the Legislature that preventive services shall be given equal priority with all other basic regional center services. These services shall, inasmuch as feasible, be provided by appropriate generic agencies, including, but not limited to, county departments of health, perinatal centers, and genetic centers. The department shall implement operating procedures to ensure that prevention activities are funded from regional center purchase of service funds only when funding for these services is unavailable from local generic agencies. In no case, shall regional center funds be used to supplant funds budgeted by any agency which has a responsibility to provide prevention services to the general public.

(b) For purposes of this section, “generic agency” means any agency which has a legal responsibility to serve all members of the general public and which is receiving public funds for providing such services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1242, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4646.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the individual program plan and provision of services and supports by the regional center system is centered on the individual and the family of the individual with developmental disabilities and takes into account the needs and preferences of the individual and the family, if appropriate. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the individual program plan be developed using a
 person-centered approach that reflects the needs and preferences of the consumer, and, as appropriate, their family. The services and supports provided by the regional center should assist each consumer in achieving their personal outcomes and life goals and promote inclusion in their community. It is the further intent of the Legislature to ensure that the provision of services to consumers and their families be effective in meeting the goals stated in the individual program plan, reflect the preferences and choices of the consumer, and reflect the cost-effective use of public resources.

(b) The individual program plan is developed through a process of individualized needs determination. The individual with developmental disabilities and, if appropriate, the individual’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, shall have the opportunity to actively participate in the development of the
 plan.

(c) An individual program plan shall be developed for any person who, following intake and assessment, is found to be eligible for regional center services. These plans shall be completed within 60 days of the completion of the assessment. At the time of intake, the regional center shall inform the consumer and, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, of the services available through the state council and the protection and advocacy agency designated by the Governor pursuant to federal law, and shall provide the address and telephone numbers of those agencies.

(d) Individual program plans shall be prepared jointly by the planning team. Decisions concerning the consumer’s goals, objectives, and services and supports that will be included in the consumer’s individual program plan and purchased by the regional center
 or obtained from generic agencies shall be made by agreement between the regional center representative and the consumer or, if appropriate, the parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative at the program plan meeting.

(e) Regional centers shall comply with the request of a consumer or, if appropriate, the request of the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, that a designated representative receive written notice of all meetings to develop or revise the individual program plan and of all notices sent to the consumer pursuant to Section 4710. The designated representative may be a parent or family member.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other law,
 a meeting regarding the provision of services and supports by the regional center, including a meeting to develop or revise the individual program plan, shall be held by remote electronic communications if requested by the consumer or, if appropriate, if requested by the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative.

(2) (A) If the regional center has not held an in-person individual program plan meeting or completed any other in-person meeting or visit with the consumer in the previous 12 months, the regional center shall hold an in-person individual program plan meeting or other meeting or visit at a location and at a time that is convenient for, and reflects the preference of, the consumer, and, as appropriate, their parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative. This
 requirement on the part of the regional center shall not impede, delay, or prevent the timely development or revision of an individual program plan, or the timely authorization or receipt of services and supports.

(B) The in-person meeting requirement established in this paragraph shall remain in effect pending the department’s review, in coordination with stakeholders, of implementation of this subdivision, as amended by the act that added this paragraph. The review shall include the development of recommendations that may include, but not be limited to, whether and to what extent the in-person requirements are effective in assisting the consumer in meeting the goals stated in the individual program plan, in positively facilitating and improving service access and equity, and in helping to build relationships between service coordinators
 and parents, legal guardians, conservators, or authorized representatives. The department shall, after consulting with and receiving input from stakeholders, provide an update to the Legislature on the status of the review no later than January 10, 2026 and shall provide, with any additional consultation and documented input from stakeholders, the completed review to the Legislature no later than May 14, 2026.

(g) At the conclusion of an individual program plan meeting, an authorized representative of the regional center shall provide to the consumer, in written or electronic format, a list of the agreed-upon services and supports, and, if known, the projected start date, the frequency and duration of the services and supports, and the provider. The authorized representative of the regional center shall sign the list of agreed-upon services and supports at that time. The consumer, or if appropriate, the consumer’s
 parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative shall sign the list of agreed-upon services and supports prior to its implementation. The consumer, or if appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, may elect to delay receipt of the list of agreed-upon services and supports pending final agreement, as described in subdivision (h). If the consumer, or if appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, elects to delay the receipt of the list of agreed-upon services and supports for 15 days, the list shall be provided in the preferred language of the consumer, or of the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, or authorized representative.

(h) If a final agreement regarding the services and supports to be provided to the consumer cannot be reached at a program plan meeting, then a subsequent program plan meeting shall be convened within 15
 days, or later at the request of the consumer or, if appropriate, the parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative or if agreed to by the planning team. The list of the agreed-upon services and supports described in subdivision (g) and signed by the authorized representative of the regional center shall be provided, in writing or electronically, at the conclusion of the subsequent program plan meeting, and shall be provided in the preferred language of the consumer, or of the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative. Additional program plan meetings may be held with the agreement of the regional center representative and the consumer or, if appropriate, the parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative.

(i) An authorized representative of the regional center and the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized
 representative shall sign the individual program plan and the list of the agreed-upon services and supports prior to its implementation. If the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, does not agree with all components of the individual program plan, the consumer may indicate that disagreement on the plan. Disagreement with specific plan components shall not prohibit the implementation of services and supports agreed to by the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative. If the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, does not agree with the plan in whole or in part, the consumer shall be sent written notice of their appeal rights, as required by Sections 4701 and 4710.

(j) (1) A regional center shall communicate in the
 consumer’s preferred language, or, if appropriate, the preferred language of the consumer’s family, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, during the planning process for the individual program plan, including during the program plan meeting, and including providing alternative communication services, as required by Sections 11135 to 11139, inclusive, of the Government Code and implementing regulations.

(2) A regional center shall provide alternative communication services, including providing copies of the list of services and supports, and the individual program plan in the preferred language of the consumer or the consumer’s family, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, or both, as required by Sections 11135 to 11139, inclusive, of the Government Code and implementing regulations.

(3) The preferred language of the consumer or the
 consumer’s family, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, or both, shall be documented in the individual program plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 47, Sec. 7.   (AB 162)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4646.4.

(a) Regional centers shall ensure, at the time of development, scheduled review, or modification of a consumer’s individual program plan developed pursuant to Sections 4646 and 4646.5, or of an individualized family service plan pursuant to Section 95020 of the Government Code, the establishment of an internal process. This internal process shall ensure adherence with federal and state law and regulation, and if purchasing services and supports, shall ensure all of the following:

(1) Conformance with the regional center’s purchase of service policies, as approved by the department pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4434.

(2) Utilization of generic services and supports if appropriate, in accordance with all of the following:

(A) The individualized family service planning team for infants and toddlers eligible under Section 95014 of the Government Code may determine that a medical service identified in the individualized family service plan is not available within 60 calendar days
 through the family’s private health insurance policy or health care service plan or under the Medi-Cal program
 and therefore, in compliance with the timely provision of service requirements contained in Part 303 (commencing with Section 303.1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, will be authorized for purchase-of-service funding by the regional center.

(B) The individual program plan team under Section 4646 may determine that a medical service identified in the individual program plan is not available within 60 calendar days through the family’s private health insurance policy or health care service plan or under the Medi-Cal program and therefore, in compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4659, will be authorized for purchase-of-service funding by the regional center.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, a regional center shall authorize the provision of medical services through the purchase of
 services during any plan delays, including the appeals process.

(3) (A) Utilization of other services and sources of funding as contained in Section 4659.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, a regional center shall authorize the provision of medical or dental services through the purchase of services during any plan delays, including the appeals process.

(4) Consideration of the family’s responsibility for providing similar services and supports for a minor child without disabilities in identifying the consumer’s service and support needs as provided in the
 least restrictive and most appropriate setting. In this determination, regional centers shall take into account the consumer’s need for extraordinary care, services, supports and supervision, and the need for timely access to this care.

(5) Commencing October 1, 2022, consideration of information obtained from the consumer and, if appropriate, the parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative about the consumer’s need for the services, barriers to service access, and other information.

(b) At the time of development, scheduled review, or modification of a consumer’s individual program plan developed pursuant to Sections 4646 and 4646.5, or of an individualized family service plan pursuant to Section 95020 of the Government Code, the consumer, or, if appropriate, the parents, legal guardian, or conservator, shall provide copies of their health benefit cards
 under which the consumer is eligible to receive health benefits, including, but not limited to, private health insurance, a health care service plan, Medi-Cal, Medicare, and TRICARE. If the individual, or, if appropriate, the parents, legal guardians, or conservators, do not have health benefits, the regional center shall not use that fact to negatively impact the services that the individual may or may not receive from the regional center.

(c) Final decisions regarding the consumer’s individual program plan shall be made pursuant to Section 4646.

(d) Final decisions regarding the individualized family service plan shall be made pursuant to Section 95020 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 18.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4646.5.

(a) The planning process for the individual program plan described in Section 4646 shall include all of the following:

(1) Gathering information and conducting assessments to determine the life goals, capabilities and strengths, preferences, barriers, and concerns or problems of the person with developmental disabilities. For children with developmental disabilities, this process should include a review of the strengths, preferences, and needs of the child and the family unit as a whole. Assessments shall be conducted by qualified individuals and performed in natural environments whenever possible. Information shall be taken from the consumer, the consumer’s parents and other family
 members, the consumer’s friends, advocates, authorized representative, if applicable, providers of services and supports, and other agencies. The assessment process shall reflect awareness of, and sensitivity to, the lifestyle and cultural background of the consumer and the family.

(2) A statement of goals, based on the needs, preferences, and life choices of the individual with developmental disabilities, and a statement of specific, time-limited objectives for implementing the person’s goals and addressing the person’s needs. These objectives shall be stated in terms that allow measurement of progress or monitoring of service delivery. These goals and objectives should maximize opportunities for the consumer to develop relationships, be part of community life in the areas of community participation, housing, work, school, and leisure, increase
 control over the consumer’s life, acquire increasingly positive roles in community life, and develop competencies to help accomplish these goals.

(3) In developing individual program plans for children, regional centers shall be guided by the principles, process, and services and support parameters set forth in Section 4685.

(4) In developing an individual program plan for a transition age youth or working age adult, the planning team shall consider the Employment First Policy described in Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4868).

(5) A schedule of the type and amount of services and supports to be purchased by the regional center or obtained from generic agencies or other resources in order to achieve the
 individual program plan goals and objectives, and identification of the provider or providers of service responsible for attaining each objective, including, but not limited to, vendors, contracted providers, generic service agencies, and natural supports. The
 individual program plan shall specify the approximate scheduled start date for services and supports and shall contain timelines for actions necessary to begin services and supports, including generic services. In addition to the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 4646, each regional center shall offer, and upon request provide, a written copy of the individual program plan to the consumer, and, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative within 45 days of their request in a threshold language, as defined by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1810.410 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(6) If agreed to by the consumer, the parents, legally appointed guardian, or authorized representative of a minor consumer, or the legally appointed
 conservator of an adult consumer or the authorized representative, including those appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, subdivision (b) of Section 4701.6, and subdivision (e) of Section 4705, a review of the general health status of the adult or child, including medical, dental, and mental health needs, shall be conducted. This review shall include a discussion of current medications, any observed side effects, and the date of the last review of the medication. Service providers shall cooperate with the planning team to provide any information necessary to complete the health status review. If any concerns are noted during the review, referrals shall be made to regional center clinicians or to the consumer’s physician, as appropriate. Documentation of health status and referrals shall be made in the consumer’s record by the service coordinator.

(7) (A) The development of a transportation access plan for a consumer when all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The regional center is purchasing private, specialized transportation services or services from a residential, day, or other provider, excluding vouchered service providers, to transport the consumer to and from day or work services.

(ii) The planning team has determined that a consumer’s community integration and participation could be safe and enhanced through the use of public transportation services.

(iii) The planning team has determined that generic transportation services are available and accessible.

(B) To maximize independence and community integration and participation, the transportation access plan shall identify the services and supports necessary to assist the consumer in accessing public transportation and shall comply with Section 4648.35. These services and supports may include, but are not limited to, mobility training services and the use of transportation aides. Regional centers are encouraged to coordinate with local public transportation agencies.

(8) A schedule of regular periodic review and reevaluation to ascertain that planned services have been provided, that objectives have been fulfilled within the times specified, and that consumers and families are satisfied with the individual program plan and its implementation.

(9) (A) When a regional center consumer is being cared for in the family home, no later than the consumer’s 22nd birthday, and annually thereafter, a discussion regarding caregiver succession and, if determined by the consumer or the consumer’s representative to be necessary, development of a caregiver succession plan, which may include, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(i) Identification of individuals who may provide care to the consumer when the current caregiver is no longer able to perform the necessary tasks.

(ii) Identification of possible housing options for the regional center consumer when the consumer can no longer live at home.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “caregiver succession” means the point at which the primary caregiver is no longer able to fully care for a regional center consumer.

(b) For all active cases, individual program plans shall be reviewed and modified by the planning team, through the process described in Section 4646, as necessary, in response to the person’s
 achievement or changing needs, and no less often than once every three years. If the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, authorized representative, or conservator requests an individual program plan review, the individual program plan shall be reviewed within 30 days after the request is submitted, or no later than 7 days after the request is submitted if necessary for the consumer’s health and safety or to maintain the consumer in their home.

(c) (1) The department, with the participation of representatives of a statewide consumer organization, the Association of Regional Center Agencies, an organized labor organization representing service coordination staff, and the state council shall prepare training material and a standard format and instructions for the preparation
 of individual program plans, which embody an approach centered on the person and family.

(2) Each regional center shall use the training materials and format prepared by the department pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The department shall biennially review a random sample of individual program plans at each regional center to ensure that these plans are being developed and modified in compliance with Section 4646 and this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 441, Sec. 1.   (AB 3291)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4646.55.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, and to the extent federal financial participation is available, effective July 1, 2007, the State Department of Developmental Services is hereby authorized to make supplemental payment to an enrolled Medi-Cal provider that is a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled, for day treatment and transportation services provided pursuant to Sections 4646 and 4646.5, applicable regulations, and Section 14132.925, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries residing in a licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, licensed intermediate
 care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing, or licensed intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled. These payments shall be considered supplemental payments to the enrolled Medi-Cal provider and shall be comprised of the full costs of reimbursing regional centers for making disbursements to day treatment and transportation service providers, plus a coordination fee which will include an administrative fee and reimbursement for the increased costs associated with the quality assurance fee paid accordingly and without a separate State Department of Developmental Services contract.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and to the extent federal financial participation is available, and in furtherance of this section and Section 14132.925, the State Department of Developmental Services shall amend the regional center contracts for the 2007–08 and 2008–09 fiscal years to extend the contract liquidation period until December 31,
 2011. The contract amendments and budget adjustments shall be exempt from the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 4620).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 37, Sec. 11.   (AB 104)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (e) of Section 14132.925.)
-------------------------------------------

4646.6.
